Maryland, session 2026, SB0699.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–864.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PHYSICAL THERAPY SERVICES” MEANS SERVICES
PROVIDED TO A PATIENT WITHIN THE SCOPE OF PRACTICE OF A PHYSICAL
THERAPIST WHO IS LICENSED BY THE STATE BOARD OF PHYSICAL THERAPY
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0699*

SENATE BILL 699
EXAMINERS TO PRACTICE PHYSICAL THERAPY UNDER THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS
ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR PHYSICAL THERAPY UNDER INDIVIDUAL, GROUP, OR
BLANKET HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR
DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR PHYSICAL THERAPY UNDER INDIVIDUAL OR GROUP CONTRACTS
THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) FOR EACH DATE COVERED PHYSICAL THERAPY SERVICES ARE
PROVIDED, AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT IMPOSE A COPAYMENT,
COINSURANCE, OR DEDUCTIBLE AMOUNT FOR THE PHYSICAL THERAPY SERVICES
THAT IS GREATER THAN THE COPAYMENT, COINSURANCE, OR DEDUCTIBLE AMOUNT
IMPOSED FOR AN ANNUAL PHYSICAL OR WELLNESS VISIT UNDER THE SAME PLAN OR
CONTRACT.
(D) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL CLEARLY STATE IN EACH
PLAN OR CONTRACT THE COVERAGE REQUIREMENTS, LIMITATIONS, CONDITIONS,
AND EXCLUSIONS FOR THE PROVISION OF PHYSICAL THERAPY SERVICES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.